Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DEPREDATION PAYMENTS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for compensation payments under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.737, for livestock destroyed or crippled by wolves. If the amount in the first year is insufficient, the amount in the second year is available in the first year. The commissioner may use up to $5,000 of this appropriation each year to reimburse expenses incurred by university extension agents to provide fair market values of destroyed or crippled livestock. new text end new text begin (b) $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for compensation payments under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.7371, for crop or fence damage caused by elk. If the amount in the first year is insufficient, the amount in the second year is available in the first year. new text end new text begin (c) If the commissioner of agriculture determines that claims made under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.737 or 3.7371, are unusually high, the commissioner may use money appropriated for either program for the purposes under this section. new text end